GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/italian.lexc
LEXICON V02E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V02E6	0:ano		V00E6;
LEXICON V02E	V02E1; V02E2; V02E3; V02E4; V02E5; V02E6;

LEXICON V02F1	0:essi		V00F1;
LEXICON V02F2	0:essi		V00F2;
LEXICON V02F3	0:esse		V00F3;
LEXICON V02F4	0:essimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V02F5	0:este		V00F5;
LEXICON V02F6	0:essero	V00F6;
LEXICON V02F	V02F1; V02F2; V02F3; V02F4; V02F5; V02F6;

LEXICON V02G1	0:erei		V00G1;
LEXICON V02G2	0:eresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V02G3	0:erebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V02G4	0:eremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V02G5	0:ereste	V00G5;
LEXICON V02G6	0:erebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V02G	V02G1; V02G2; V02G3; V02G4; V02G5; V02G6;

LEXICON V02H	0:ent		V00H;
LEXICON V02I	0:ut		V00I;	
LEXICON V02L	0:endo		V00L;	
LEXICON V02M	0:ere		V00M;
	
LEXICON V02N2	0:i		V00N2;
LEXICON V02N3	0:a		V00N3;
LEXICON V02N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V02N5	0:ete		V00N5;
LEXICON V02N6	0:ano		V00N6;
LEXICON V02N	V02N2; V02N3; V02N4; V02N5; V02N6;

LEXICON V02	V02A; V02B; V02C; V02D; V02E; V02F; V02G; 
		V02H; V02I; V02L; V02M; V02N;


!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 3   (servire)             
!radice/i: serv
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4         5          6
!
!ind_pre   a           o          i          e       iamo       ite        ono 
!ind_imp   b         ivo        ivi        iva      ivamo     ivate      ivano
!pas_rem   c          ii       isti         i`       immo      iste      irono
!futuro    d        iro`       irai       ira`      iremo     irete     iranno
!con_pre   e           a          a         a        iamo      iate        ano 
!con_imp   f        issi       issi      isse      issimo      iste     issero
!condiz    g        irei     iresti    irebbe      iremmo    ireste   irebbero
!part_pre  h        ente       enti
!part_pas  i         ito (ita,iti,ite)
!gerundio  l        endo
!infinito  m         ire
!imperat   n                      i          a       iamo       ite        ano

LEXICON V03A1	0:o		V00A1;
LEXICON V03A2	0:i		V00A2;
LEXICON V03A3	0:e		V00A3;
LEXICON V03A4	0:iamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V03A5	0:ite		V00A5;
LEXICON V03A6	0:ono		V00A6;
LEXICON V03A	V03A1; V03A2; V03A3; V03A4; V03A5; V03A6;

LEXICON V03B1	0:ivo		V00B1;
LEXICON V03B2	0:ivi		V00B2;
LEXICON V03B3	0:iva		V00B3;
LEXICON V03B4	0:ivamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V03B5	0:ivate		V00B5;
LEXICON V03B6	0:ivano		V00B6;
LEXICON V03B	V03B1; V03B2; V03B3; V03B4; V03B5; V03B6;

LEXICON V03C1	0:ii		V00C1;
LEXICON V03C2	0:isti		V00C2;
LEXICON V03C3	0:ì		V00C3;
LEXICON V03C4	0:immo		V00C4;
LEXICON V03C5	0:iste		V00C5;
LEXICON V03C6	0:irono		V00C6;
LEXICON V03C	V03C1; V03C2; V03C3; V03C4; V03C5; V03C6;

LEXICON V03D1	0:irò		V00D1;
LEXICON V03D2	0:irai		V00D2;
LEXICON V03D3	0:irà		V00D3;
LEXICON V03D4	0:iremo		V00D4;
LEXICON V03D5	0:irete		V00D5;
LEXICON V03D6	0:iranno		V00D6;
LEXICON V03D	V03D1; V03D2; V03D3; V03D4; V03D5; V03D6;

LEXICON V03E1	0:a		V00E1;
LEXICON V03E2	0:a		V00E2;
LEXICON V03E3	0:a		V00E3;
LEXICON V03E4	0:iamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V03E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V03E6	0:ano		V00E6;
LEXICON V03E	V03E1; V03E2; V03E3; V03E4; V03E5; V03E6;

LEXICON V03F1	0:issi		V00F1;
LEXICON V03F2	0:issi		V00F2;
LEXICON V03F3	0:isse		V00F3;
LEXICON V03F4	0:issimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V03F5	0:iste		V00F5;
LEXICON V03F6	0:issero	V00F6;
LEXICON V03F	V03F1; V03F2; V03F3; V03F4; V03F5; V03F6;

LEXICON V03G1	0:irei		V00G1;
LEXICON V03G2	0:iresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V03G3	0:irebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V03G4	0:iremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V03G5	0:ireste	V00G5;
LEXICON V03G6	0:irebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V03G	V03G1; V03G2; V03G3; V03G4; V03G5; V03G6;

LEXICON V03H	0:ent		V00H;
LEXICON V03I	0:it		V00I;	
LEXICON V03L	0:endo		V00L;	
LEXICON V03M	0:ire		V00M;
	
LEXICON V03N2	0:i		V00N2;
LEXICON V03N3	0:a		V00N3;
LEXICON V03N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V03N5	0:ite		V00N5;
LEXICON V03N6	0:ano		V00N6;
LEXICON V03N	V03N2; V03N3; V03N4; V03N5; V03N6;

LEXICON V03	V03A; V03B; V03C; V03D; V03E; V03F; V03G; 
		V03H; V03I; V03L; V03M; V03N;

!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 4   (cercare)             
!radice/i: cerc
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4         5          6
!
!ind_pre   a           o         hi          a      hiamo       ate        ano 
!ind_imp   b         avo        avi        ava      avamo     avate      avano
!pas_rem   c          ai       asti         o`       ammo      aste      arono
!futuro    d       hero`      herai      hera`     heremo     herete    heranno
!con_pre   e          hi         hi         hi      hiamo     hiate       hino 
!con_imp   f        assi       assi      asse      assimo      aste     assero
!condiz    g       herei    heresti   herebbe     heremmo   hereste  herebbero
!part_pre  h        ante       anti
!part_pas  i         ato (ata,ati,ate)
!gerundio  l        ando
!infinito  m         are
!imperat   n                      a         hi      hiamo       ate       hino

LEXICON V04A1	0:o		V00A1;
LEXICON V04A2	0:hi		V00A2;
LEXICON V04A3	0:a		V00A3;
LEXICON V04A4	0:hiamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V04A5	0:ate		V00A5;
LEXICON V04A6	0:ano		V00A6;
LEXICON V04A	V04A1; V04A2; V04A3; V04A4; V04A5; V04A6;

LEXICON V04B1	0:avo		V00B1;
LEXICON V04B2	0:avi		V00B2;
LEXICON V04B3	0:ava		V00B3;
LEXICON V04B4	0:avamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V04B5	0:avate		V00B5;
LEXICON V04B6	0:avano		V00B6;
LEXICON V04B	V04B1; V04B2; V04B3; V04B4; V04B5; V04B6;

LEXICON V04C1	0:ai		V00C1;
LEXICON V04C2	0:asti		V00C2;
LEXICON V04C3	0:ò		V00C3;
LEXICON V04C4	0:ammo		V00C4;
LEXICON V04C5	0:aste		V00C5;
LEXICON V04C6	0:arono		V00C6;
LEXICON V04C	V04C1; V04C2; V04C3; V04C4; V04C5; V04C6;

LEXICON V04D1	0:herò		V00D1;
LEXICON V04D2	0:herai		V00D2;
LEXICON V04D3	0:herà		V00D3;
LEXICON V04D4	0:heremo	V00D4;
LEXICON V04D5	0:herete	V00D5;
LEXICON V04D6	0:heranno	V00D6;
LEXICON V04D	V04D1; V04D2; V04D3; V04D4; V04D5; V04D6;

LEXICON V04E1	0:hi		V00E1;
LEXICON V04E2	0:hi		V00E2;
LEXICON V04E3	0:hi		V00E3;
LEXICON V04E4	0:hiamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V04E5	0:hiate		V00E5;
LEXICON V04E6	0:hino		V00E6;
LEXICON V04E	V04E1; V04E2; V04E3; V04E4; V04E5; V04E6;

LEXICON V04F1	0:assi		V00F1;
LEXICON V04F2	0:assi		V00F2;
LEXICON V04F3	0:asse		V00F3;
LEXICON V04F4	0:assimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V04F5	0:aste		V00F5;
LEXICON V04F6	0:assero	V00F6;
LEXICON V04F	V04F1; V04F2; V04F3; V04F4; V04F5; V04F6;

LEXICON V04G1	0:herei		V00G1;
LEXICON V04G2	0:heresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V04G3	0:herebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V04G4	0:heremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V04G5	0:hereste	V00G5;
LEXICON V04G6	0:herebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V04G	V04G1; V04G2; V04G3; V04G4; V04G5; V04G6;

LEXICON V04H	0:ant		V00H;
LEXICON V04I	0:at		V00I;	
LEXICON V04L	0:ando		V00L;	
LEXICON V04M	0:are		V00M;
	
LEXICON V04N2	0:i		V00N2;
LEXICON V04N3	0:a		V00N3;
LEXICON V04N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V04N5	0:ate		V00N5;
LEXICON V04N6	0:ano		V00N6;
LEXICON V04N	V04N2; V04N3; V04N4; V04N5; V04N6;

LEXICON V04	V04A; V04B; V04C; V04D; V04E; V04F; V04G; 
		V04H; V04I; V04L; V04M; V04N;

!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 5   (baciare)
!radice/i: bac
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4          5          6
!
!ind_pre   a          io          i         ia       iamo       iate       iano
!ind_imp   b        iavo       iavi       iava     iavamo     iavate     iavano
!pas_rem   c         iai      iasti        io`      iammo      iaste     iarono
!futuro    d        ero`       erai       era`      eremo      erete     eranno
!con_pre   e           i          i          i       iamo       iate        ino
!con_imp   f       iassi      iassi      iasse    iassimo      iaste    iassero
!condiz    g        erei     eresti     erebbe     eremmo     ereste   erebbero
!part_pre  h       iante      ianti
!part_pas  i        iato (iata,iati,iate)
!gerundio  l       iando
!infinito  m        iare
!imperat   n                     ia         i        iamo       iate        ino

LEXICON V05A1	0:io		V00A1;
LEXICON V05A2	0:i		V00A2;
LEXICON V05A3	0:ia		V00A3;
LEXICON V05A4	0:iamo		V00A4;

LEXICON MAIN
andare+Verb:and	V04B;
andare+Verb:and	V04C;
andare+Verb:and	V04H;
andare+Verb:and	V04I;
andare+Verb:and	V04L;
andare+Verb:and	V04M;
andare+Verb:v	V04A3;
compiere+Verb+Trans:comp	V02E5;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04A;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04B;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04C;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04E;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04F;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04H;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04I;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04L;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04M;
coniare+Verb+Trans:con	V04N;
desistere+Verb:desist	V02F;
desistere+Verb:desist	V02H;
desistere+Verb:desist	V02L;
deviare+Verb+Trans:devi	V04A2;
deviare+Verb+Trans:devi	V04D;
deviare+Verb+Trans:devi	V04F;
dirimere+Verb+Trans:dirim	V02E;
disgiungere+Verb+Trans:disgiung	V02N;
dispiacere+Verb:dispiac	V02G;
dispiacere+Verb:dispiac	V02M;
divenire+Verb:diven	V03A5;
divenire+Verb:diven	V03N5;
divertire+Verb+Trans:divert	V03;
farneticare+Verb+Trans:farnetic	V04;
giacere+Verb:giacci	V02E6;
giacere+Verb:giacc	V02E5;
indire+Verb+Trans:indic	V02F;
indire+Verb+Trans:indic	V02H;
indire+Verb+Trans:indic	V02L;
indire+Verb+Trans:indic	V02N2;
indire+Verb+Trans:indic	V02N3;
indire+Verb+Trans:indic	V02N4;
indire+Verb+Trans:indic	V02N6;
indire+Verb+Trans:ind	V03D;
indire+Verb+Trans:ind	V03G;
intercedere+Verb:interced	V02;
introdurre+Verb+Trans:introduc	V02E;
misconoscere+Verb+Trans:misconosci	V02I;
morire+Verb:mor	V03B;
morire+Verb:mor	V03F;
morire+Verb:mor	V03H;
morire+Verb:mor	V03L;
morire+Verb:muoi	V03A1;
morire+Verb:muoi	V03A6;
morire+Verb:muoi	V03E1;
morire+Verb:muoi	V03E2;
morire+Verb:muoi	V03E3;
morire+Verb:muoi	V03E6;
morire+Verb:muoi	V03N3;
morire+Verb:muor	V03A2;
morire+Verb:muor	V03A3;
offrire+Verb+Trans:offr	V03A;
offrire+Verb+Trans:offr	V03C2;
offrire+Verb+Trans:offr	V03C4;
offrire+Verb+Trans:offr	V03C5;
offrire+Verb+Trans:offr	V03E;
offrire+Verb+Trans:offr	V03M;
offrire+Verb+Trans:offr	V03N;
parere+Verb:par	V02N5;
persistere+Verb:persist	V03I;
potere+Verb+Modal:pot	V02M;
prescindere+Verb:prescind	V02G;
presentire+Verb+Trans:present	V03;
prevenire+Verb+Trans:preven	V03A4;
prevenire+Verb+Trans:preven	V03A5;
prevenire+Verb+Trans:preven	V03E4;
prevenire+Verb+Trans:preven	V03E5;
prevenire+Verb+Trans:preven	V03N4;
prevenire+Verb+Trans:preven	V03N5;
prosciugare+Verb+Trans:prosciug	V04;
provvedere+Verb:provved	V02N;
rarefare+Verb+Trans:rarefacci	V05A1;
rarefare+Verb+Trans:rarefacci	V05A4;
ricoprire+Verb+Trans:ricopr	V03A;
ricoprire+Verb+Trans:ricopr	V03E;
ricoprire+Verb+Trans:ricopr	V03N;
ricucire+Verb+Trans:ricuc	V03D;
ricucire+Verb+Trans:ricuc	V03G;
ridire+Verb+Trans:ridic	V02N2;
riempire+Verb+Trans:riempi	V03F;
riempire+Verb+Trans:riempi	V03H;
riempire+Verb+Trans:riempi	V03L;
riempire+Verb+Trans:riempi	V03N6;
riempire+Verb+Trans:riemp	V03B;
riempire+Verb+Trans:riemp	V03C;
riempire+Verb+Trans:riemp	V03N2;
riflettere+Verb:riflett	V02E;
rinvenire+Verb:rinven	V03C2;
rinvenire+Verb:rinven	V03C4;
rinvenire+Verb:rinven	V03C5;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risalg	V03A1;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risalg	V03A6;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risalg	V03E1;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risalg	V03E2;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risalg	V03E3;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risalg	V03N3;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risal	V03A2;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risal	V03A3;
risalire+Verb+Trans:risal	V03E6;
rivendere+Verb+Trans:rivend	V02;
scucire+Verb+Trans:scuci	V03N6;
scucire+Verb+Trans:scuc	V03A4;
scucire+Verb+Trans:scuc	V03E4;
scucire+Verb+Trans:scuc	V03E5;
scucire+Verb+Trans:scuc	V03N2;
scucire+Verb+Trans:scuc	V03N4;
sedere+Verb:sed	V02N4;
sedere+Verb:sed	V02N5;
sedere+Verb:sied	V02N3;
sedere+Verb:sied	V02N6;
soffrire+Verb+Trans:soffr	V03M;
soggiacere+Verb:giacci	V02E6;
soggiacere+Verb:soggiacc	V02E5;
soprassedere+Verb:soprassed	V02I;
spandere+Verb+Trans:spand	V02H;
spandere+Verb+Trans:spand	V02L;
splendere+Verb:splend	V02G;
strafare+Verb+Trans:strafacc	V05A1;
strafare+Verb+Trans:strafacc	V05A4;
sussistere+Verb:sussist	V02F;
sussistere+Verb:sussist	V03I;
uscire+Verb+Trans:usc	V03C;
vigere+Verb:vig	V02E6;
vigere+Verb:vig	V02F3;
vigere+Verb:vig	V02F6;
vigere+Verb:vig	V02G3;
vigere+Verb:vig	V02G6;
